North Dakota, session 69, SB2344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 39-04-10.10 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
39-04-10.10. North Dakota veterans' number plates.
1. The director may issue distinctive number plates to individuals eligible for interment in
the North Dakota veterans' cemetery. The director shall issue a number plate under
this section upon receiving:
a. Payment payment of all other fees required under this chapter for registration of a
motor vehicle;
b. Payment of an initial fee of fifteen dollars of which ten dollars is to be deposited in
the highway tax distribution fund and five dollars is to be deposited in the
veterans' cemetery maintenance fund unless for a plate issued to a veteran who
has been awarded the purple heart, then there is not an initial fee; and
c. Verification of subsequent payments of an annual surcharge of ten dollars paid to
the adjutant general unless for a plate issued to a veteran who has been
awarded the purple heart, then there is not an annual surcharge.
2. The department shall collect the fees and the ten dollar surcharge under this section.
The department shall report to the legislative assembly on the funds collected under
this section during each legislative session. The department shall pay the funds
collected under subdivisions b and c of subsection 1 to the adjutant general monthly,
who then, within ten days of receipt of the funds, shall deposit five dollars of each
initial fee in the veterans' cemetery maintenance fund and the ten dollar surcharge
Page No. 1 25.1161.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
shall be divided with five dollars being deposited in the veterans' cemetery trust fund
and five dollars being deposited in the veterans' cemetery maintenance fund in the
state treasury. Investment of the veterans' cemetery maintenance fund and veterans'
cemetery trust fund is the responsibility of the state treasurer who shall have full
authority to invest the fund only in the same manner as the state investment board is
authorized to make investments. At the request of the adjutant general, the interest in
the veterans' cemetery trust fund must be deposited in the veterans' cemetery
maintenance fund for the purpose of funding salaries and maintenance of the
veterans' cemetery.
3. The veterans' cemetery trust fund may accept funds from private and federal sources.
Page No. 2 25.1161.01000